Florida, session 2026, HB737.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 744.309, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
744.309 Who may be appointed guardian of a resident ward.—
(3) DISQUALIFIED PERSONS.—
(a) The following persons are disqualified from being
appointed a guardian under this section:
1. A No person who has been convicted of a felony, except
as provided in paragraph (e).
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb737-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 737 2026
2. A person or who, from any incapacity or illness, is
incapable of discharging the duties of a guardian, or who is
otherwise unsuitable to perform the duties of a guardian.
3. A, shall be appointed to act as guardian. Further, no
person who has been judicially determined to have committed
abuse, abandonment, or neglect against a child as defined in s.
39.01 or s. 984.03(1), (2), and (24).
4. A person, or who has been found guilty of, regardless
of adjudication, or entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty
to, any offense prohibited under s. 435.04 or similar statute of
another jurisdiction, shall be appointed to act as a guardian.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) or subsection
(6), a person who provides substantial services to the proposed
ward in a professional or business capacity, or a creditor of
the proposed ward, may not be appointed guardian and retain that
previous professional or business relationship.
(c) A person may not be appointed a guardian if he or she
is in the employ of any person, agency, government, or
corporation that provides service to the proposed ward in a
professional or business capacity, except that a person so
employed may be appointed if he or she is the spouse, adult
child, parent, or sibling of the proposed ward or the court
determines that the potential conflict of interest is
insubstantial and that the appointment would clearly be in the
proposed ward's best interest.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb737-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 737 2026
(d) The court may not appoint a guardian in any other
circumstance in which a conflict of interest may occur.
(e)1. Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a court may appoint a
person who has been convicted of a felony to serve as a guardian
if all of the following conditions are met:
a. The person is the parent of the proposed ward.
b. The person has disclosed his or her felony conviction
to the court.
c. The person's felony conviction, and all of the terms
and conditions of the sentence, have been fulfilled, completed,
or terminated at least 10 years before the filing of the
application for appointment. For purposes of this sub-
subparagraph, the terms and conditions of the sentence include,
but are not limited to, incarceration, parole, fines,
restitution and financial penalties, and any other condition
required to fulfill the felony conviction.
d. The felony conviction did not involve financial
exploitation, breach of fiduciary duty, or any offense involving
financial harm or dishonesty to a vulnerable adult as defined in
s. 415.102.
e. The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that
the person is otherwise qualified, suitable, and fit to serve as
a guardian under this chapter.
f. The court finds that the appointment is in the best
interests of the proposed ward.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb737-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 737 2026
2. The court must consider imposing additional
requirements on a guardian appointed under this paragraph to
safeguard the proposed ward and the proposed ward's property,
including, but not limited to:
a. Requiring a bond to protect the proposed ward's assets.
b. Imposing a court-approved budget of the proposed ward's
expenses.
c. Increasing the frequency with which the guardian must
file with the court his or her plans and accountings.
3. This paragraph does not require the court to appoint a
person who meets the criteria in this paragraph, and the court
may deny an appointment if it determines that the appointment
would place the proposed ward, or his or her property, at risk.
Section 2. Subsection (9) of section 744.474, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
744.474 Reasons for removal of guardian.—A guardian may be
removed for any of the following reasons, and the removal shall
be in addition to any other penalties prescribed by law:
(9) Conviction of a felony which occurs after the
guardianship appointment.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb737-02-c2